Hawaii statutes.
§386-164 Appropriation. So much of the
state insurance fund as may be necessary is hereby appropriated for the purpose
of section 386-161 and for the purpose of paying compensation awarded under Act
131 of the Session Laws of Hawaii 1943, Act 160 of the Session Laws of Hawaii
1945, and Act 169 of the Session Laws of Hawaii 1947. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1;
Supp, §97-153; HRS §386-164]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next